District of Columbia statutes.
16-4009

Disqualification of collaborative lawyer and lawyers in associated law firm.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a collaborative lawyer is disqualified from appearing before the tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related to the collaborative matter.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section and §§ 16-4010 and 16-4011, a lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated is disqualified from appearing before the tribunal to represent a party in a proceeding related to the collaborative matter if the collaborative lawyer is disqualified from doing so under subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

A collaborative lawyer or a lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may represent a party:

(1)

To ask the tribunal to approve an agreement resulting from the collaborative law process; or

(2)

To seek or defend an emergency order to protect the health, safety, welfare, or interest of a party, family member, or other person, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title, if a successor lawyer is not immediately available to represent that person.

(d)

If subsection (c)(2) of this section applies, a collaborative lawyer, or lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated, may represent a party or family member only until that person is represented by a successor lawyer or reasonable measures are taken to protect the health, safety, welfare, or interest of the person.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

History

This section is referenced in § 16-4010, § 16-4011, § 16-4014, and § 16-4020.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 9 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.

Editor's Notes